Utah statutes.
20A-5-602.   Poll workers -- Appointment for local elections.

(1)  At least 15 days before the date scheduled for any local election, the municipal legislative body or local district board shall appoint or provide for the appointment of:

(a)  in jurisdictions using paper ballots:

(i)  three registered voters, or two registered voters and one person 17 years old who will be 18 years old by the date of the regular municipal election, who reside within the county to serve as poll workers for each voting precinct when the ballots will be counted after the polls close; or

(ii)  three registered voters, or two registered voters and one person 17 years old who will be 18 years old by the date of the regular municipal election, who reside within the county to serve as receiving judges in each voting precinct and three registered voters, or two registered voters and one person 17 years old who will be 18 years old by the date of the regular municipal election, who reside within the county to serve as counting judges in each voting precinct when ballots will be counted throughout election day;

(b)  in jurisdictions using automated tabulating equipment, three registered voters, or two registered voters and one person 17 years old who will be 18 years old by the date of the regular municipal election, who reside within the county to serve as poll workers for each voting precinct;

(c)  in jurisdictions using voting machines, four registered voters, or three registered voters and one person 17 years old who will be 18 years old by the date of the regular municipal election, who reside within the county to serve as poll workers for each voting precinct; and

(d)  in all jurisdictions:

(i)  at least one registered voter who resides within the county to serve as canvassing judge, if necessary; and

(ii)  as many alternate poll workers as needed to replace appointed poll workers who are unable to serve.

(2)  The municipal legislative body and local district board may not appoint any candidate's parent, sibling, spouse, child, or in-law to serve as a poll worker in the voting precinct where the candidate resides.

(3)  The clerk shall:

(a)  prepare and file a list containing the name, address, voting precinct, and telephone number of each person appointed; and

(b)  make the list available in the clerk's office for inspection, examination, and copying during business hours.

(4) (a)  The municipal legislative body and local district board shall compensate poll workers for their services.

(b)  The municipal legislative body and local district board may not compensate their poll workers at a rate higher than that paid by the county to its poll workers.



Amended by Chapter 75, 2007 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 256, 2007 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

